Utah statutes.
17D-2-302.   Architect or engineer certificate -- Approval of plans and specifications.

(1)  The plans and specifications submitted under Subsection 17D-3-301(1) shall include a certificate of the architect or engineer responsible for planning and designing the project, stating the estimated useful life of the project.

(2)  The creating local entity's governing body shall approve the plans, specifications, and estimated project costs before:

(a)  execution of a lease agreement with respect to the project; and

(b)  the local building authority begins to construct, acquire, improve, or extend the project.

